Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-545
Class V school district; board of education members; districts; qualifications; terms; nonpartisan ballot.

(1) A member of the board of education of a Class V school district shall be elected from each district provided for in section 32-552. Such election shall be held on the date provided in subsection (2) of this section. The members of such board of education shall meet the qualifications found in sections 79-543 and 79-552.

(2) In 2014, candidates for election to such board of education from even-numbered districts shall be nominated at the statewide primary election and elected at the statewide general election and shall take office on the first Monday in January 2015. In 2016, candidates for election to such board of education from odd-numbered districts shall be nominated at the statewide primary election and elected at the statewide general election and shall take office on the first Monday in January 2017. Thereafter, all members shall be nominated at the statewide primary election and elected at the statewide general election, shall take office on the first Monday in January following their election, and shall serve terms of four years or until their successors are elected and qualified. Candidates for election to such board of education shall be nominated upon the nonpartisan ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 141;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1044;

Laws 2013, LB125, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB1055, § 7.